test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-caana_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čááná: # á-stems
  # Pelikukkodâh stuorrâ puustuváin
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom: čááNá
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill: čááNán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc: čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe: čánáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess: čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par: čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom: čáánáh
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: čáánái
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc: čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill: čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com: čánáiguin
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe: čánáittáá
